District of Columbia statutes.
31-2901

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Baseline mammogram” means a screening mammogram that is used as a comparison for future examinations.

(2)

“Screening mammogram” means a low dose x-ray used to visualize the internal structure of the breast.

(3)

“Cytologic screening” means a pap test to detect cervical cancer through the simple microscopic examination of cells scraped from the surface of the cervix.

(4)

“Health benefit plan” means any accident and health insurance policy or certificate, hospital and medical services corporation contract, health maintenance organization subscriber contract, plan provided by a multiple employer welfare arrangement, or plan provided by another benefit arrangement. The term “health benefit plan” does not mean accident only, credit, or disability insurance; coverage of Medicare services or federal employee health plans, pursuant to contracts with the United States government; Medicare supplemental or long-term care insurance; dental only or vision only insurance; specified disease insurance; hospital confinement indemnity coverage; limited benefit health coverage; coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance, insurance arising out of a workers’ compensation or similar law; automobile medical payment insurance; medical expense and loss of income benefits; or insurance under which benefits are payable with or without regard to fault and that is statutorily required to be contained in any liability insurance policy or equivalent self-insurance.

History

Mar. 7, 1991, D.C. Law 8-225, § 2, 38 DCR 217
June 18, 2003, D.C. Law 14-312, § 401(a), 50 DCR 306

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-2401.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-312 rewrote par. (4) which had read as follows: “(4) ‘Health insurance policy’ means any health insurance policy that provides for the payment of indemnity on account of sickness and is offered by Group Hospitalization and Medical Services, Incorporated, a health insurance company, a health self-insured, an insurance purchasing trust, or any health maintenance organization that offers insurance benefits or health plans in the District of Columbia (‘District’). The term ‘health insurance policy’ shall not include a hospital indemnity policy, a disability insurance policy, an accident only policy, or a student accident policy.”